Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,184
Tax Commissioner; adopt rules and regulations.

The Tax Commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to accomplish the purpose of the Tax Refund Setoff Act.

Laws 1985, LB 273, § 11.